Arizona, session 57th-2nd-regular, HB4119.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of the State of Arizona: Section 1. Title 1, chapter 3, article 1, Arizona Revised Statutes, is amended by adding section 1-323, to read: START_STATUTE1-323. Arizona jazz day A. April 30, in each year, shall be observed as Arizona jazz day. B. Arizona jazz day is not a legal holiday. C. On Arizona jazz day, residents of this state are encouraged to do all of the following: 1. Recognize the historical and cultural SIGNIFICANCE of jazz music and its influence on American and Arizona heritage. 2. Promote music education and jazz's role in inspiring creativity, unity and cross-cultural understanding. 3. Encourage statewide participation in events, festivals and educational programs that celebrate International Jazz Day. END_STATUTE